Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB251.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. On or before April 1, 2026, and annually thereafter, the
department of health and environment shall submit a report to the senate
standing committee on public health and welfare and the house of
representatives standing committee on health and human services or their
successor committees on the Kansas newborn screening program. The
report shall be developed by the department of health and environment
newborn screening staff, the Kansas newborn screening advisory council
and disability and rare disease advocacy organizations. Such report shall
include:
(a) The disorders currently screened under the Kansas newborn
screening program;
(b) new disorders under consideration or recommended for inclusion,
including the amount of funding needed to implement such screenings;
(c) disorders considered but not recommended for inclusion during
the prior 12 months, including the explanations for their exclusion;
(d) disorders that the department determined do not require
reevaluation within the prior 12 months, including the reasons for such
determinations; and
(e) any delays in meeting the specified timelines for evaluating,
including or reevaluating disorders, including the reasons for the delays.
Sec. 2. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.